Utah statutes.
11-42-410.   Amending an assessment resolution or ordinance.
(1)  A governing body may adopt a resolution or ordinance amending the
original assessment resolution or ordinance adopted under Section 11-42-404
to:
(a)  correct a deficiency, omission, error, or mistake:
(i)  with respect to:
(A)  the total cost of an improvement;
(B)  operation and maintenance costs; or
(C)  the cost of economic promotion activities; or
(ii)  that results in a tract, lot, block, or parcel not being fully assessed
or assessed in an incorrect amount;
(b)  reallocate or adjust assessments under the original assessment resolution
or ordinance for operation and maintenance costs or the costs of economic
promotion activities;
(c)  reallocate or adjust assessments under the original assessment resolution
or ordinance; or
(d)  reduce an assessment as a result of the issuance of refunding bonds.
(2)  If an amendment under Subsection (1)(a) or (c) results in an increase in
an assessment for any property owner, the governing body shall comply with the
notice requirements of Section 11-42-402, unless the owner waives notice as
provided in Section 11-42-104.
